Illinois, session 104th, HB566.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Raffles and Poker Runs Act is amended by 5changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 15/0.01)  (from Ch. 85, par. 2300)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Raffles and Poker Runs Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-644, eff. 6-10-14; 99-405, eff. 8-19-15.)